District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.01

Policy.

It shall be the policy of the District of Columbia government to establish and maintain a comprehensive occupational safety and health management program that ensures, to the maximum extent possible, a safe and healthful work environment for employees and general public users of District government facilities, and for the protection of District government property.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2001, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-621.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.1.